Illinois, session 104th, HB5404.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 5changing Section 5A-103 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 5/5A-103)7    Sec. 5A-103. Discrimination and harassment based on race, 8color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national 9origin; and retaliation.10    (a) The General Assembly finds that harassment and 11discrimination based on race, color, sex, sexual orientation, 12gender identity, or national origin has a detrimental 13influence in schools, contributing to psychological and 14physical harm and poorer academic outcomes for students of 15color, and higher rates of teacher turnover among teachers of 16color. It is the General Assembly's intent that each 17institution of elementary and secondary education in the State 18adopt and actively implement policies to reduce and respond 19effectively to harassment and discrimination based on race, 20color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, and national 21origin; to provide students, parents or guardians, and 22employees information on how to recognize and report 23harassment and discrimination; and, for students, parents or   HB5404- 2 -LRB104 19711 JRC 33161 b1guardians, and employees, to report harassment and 2discrimination based on race, color, sex, sexual orientation, 3gender identity, or national origin without fear of 4retaliation, loss of status, or loss of opportunities.5    (b) The Department shall produce a model training program 6aimed at the prevention of discrimination and harassment based 7on race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, and 8national origin in institutions of elementary and secondary 9education. The model program shall be made available to 10institutions of elementary and secondary education and to the 11public online at no cost. This model program shall regard 12participants as potential bystanders, rather than potential 13offenders, and include, at a minimum, the following:14        (1) a primary focus on preventing discrimination and 15    harassment based on race, color, sex, sexual orientation, 16    gender identity, and national origin and retaliation;17        (2) an explanation of discrimination and harassment 18    based on race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender 19    identity, and national origin and retaliation;20        (3) examples of conduct that constitutes 21    discrimination and harassment based on race, color, sex, 22    sexual orientation, gender identity, and national origin 23    and retaliation;24        (4) an explanation, with examples, of how patterns of 25    conduct can, taken together over time, rise to the level 26    of bullying, harassment, or discrimination;  HB5404- 3 -LRB104 19711 JRC 33161 b1        (5) an explanation of the difference between 2    discrimination based on disparate treatment and 3    discrimination based on disparate impact;4        (6) a summary of other classes that are protected from 5    harassment and discrimination, and a statement that 6    training intended to improve recognition of discrimination 7    and harassment based on race, color, sex, sexual 8    orientation, gender identity, and national origin does not 9    diminish protections under the law for other protected 10    classes;11        (7) an explanation of the difference between 12    harassment as defined under this Act and bullying;13        (8) a summary of relevant federal and State statutory 14    protections and remedies available to victims concerning 15    discrimination and harassment based on race, color, sex, 16    sexual orientation, gender identity, and national origin, 17    and retaliation, including, but not limited to, a summary 18    of this Act's protections from discrimination, harassment 19    and retaliation in the following contexts:20            (a) students toward other students;21            (b) teachers and other employees of an elementary 22        or secondary school toward students;23            (c) students toward teachers and other employees 24        of an elementary or secondary school; and25            (d) teachers and other employees of an elementary 26        or secondary school toward other teachers and   HB5404- 4 -LRB104 19711 JRC 33161 b1        employees of an elementary or secondary school.2        (9) directions on how to contact the Department if a 3    school fails to take corrective action to stop the 4    harassment or discrimination;5        (10) a summary of responsibilities of institutions of 6    elementary or secondary education in the prevention, 7    investigation, and corrective measures of discrimination, 8    harassment, and retaliation, including, but not limited 9    to, explanation of responsibilities in the following 10    contexts:11            (a) students toward other students;12            (b) teachers and other employees of an elementary 13        or secondary school toward students;14            (c) students toward teachers and other employees 15        of an elementary or secondary school; and16            (d) teachers and other employees of an elementary 17        or secondary school toward other teachers and 18        employees of an elementary or secondary school; and19        (11) an explanation of the liability for 20    discrimination, harassment, and retaliation under this 21    Act. 22    (c) Every institution of elementary or secondary education 23in this State shall use the model training program developed 24by the Department, establish its own training program that 25equals or exceeds the minimum standards set forth in 26subsection (b), or use an existing discrimination and   HB5404- 5 -LRB104 19711 JRC 33161 b1harassment prevention training program that equals or exceeds 2the minimum standards set forth in subsection (b). The 3training program shall be provided as a component of all new 4employee training programs for elementary and secondary 5education representatives and to existing representatives at 6least once every 2 years. For the purposes of satisfying the 7requirements under this Section, the Department's model 8program may be used to supplement any existing program an 9institution of elementary or secondary education is utilizing 10or develops.11    (d) Upon notification of a violation of subsection (c), 12the Department may launch a preliminary investigation. If the 13Department finds a violation of this Section, the Department 14may issue a notice to show cause, giving the institution of 15elementary or secondary education 30 days to correct the 16violation. If the institution of elementary or secondary 17education does not correct the violation within 30 days, the 18Department may initiate a charge of a civil rights violation.19(Source: P.A. 103-472, eff. 8-1-24.)